California statutes. Vehicle Code
(c) This section does not apply to an officer assigned exclusively to the duty of investigating and securing evidence in reference to the theft of a vehicle or failure of a person to stop in the event of an accident or violation of Section 23109 or 23109.1 or in reference to a felony charge or to an officer engaged in serving a warrant when the officer is not engaged in patrolling the highways for the purpose of enforcing the traffic laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 682, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

40805.

Every court shall be without jurisdiction to render a judgment of conviction against any person for a violation of this code involving the speed of a vehicle if the court admits any evidence or testimony secured in violation of, or which is inadmissible under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

40806.

In the event a defendant charged with an offense under this code pleads guilty, the trial court shall not at any time prior to pronouncing sentence receive or consider any report, verbal or written, of any police or traffic officer or witness of the offense without fully informing the defendant of all statements in the report or statement of witnesses, or without giving the defendant an opportunity to make answer thereto or to produce witnesses in rebuttal, and for such purpose the court shall grant a continuance before pronouncing sentence if requested by the defendant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

40807.

No record of any action taken by the department against a person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle, nor any testimony regarding the proceedings at, or concerning, or produced at, any hearing held in connection with such action, shall be admissible as evidence in any court in any criminal action.

No provision of this section shall in any way limit the admissibility of such records or testimony as is necessary to enforce the provisions of this code relating to operating a motor vehicle without a valid driver’s license or when the driving privilege is suspended or revoked, the admissibility of such records or testimony in any prosecution for failure to disclose any matter at such a hearing when required by law to do so, or the admissibility of such records and testimony when introduced solely for the purpose of impeaching the credibility of a witness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 804.)
-------------------------------------------

40808.

Subdivision (d) of Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution shall not be construed as abrogating the evidentiary provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 538, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Civil Actions [40830. - 40834.]

40830.

In either of the following circumstances a violation of any provision of this code does not establish negligence as a matter of law, but in any civil action under either of the circumstances negligence must be proved as a fact without regard to the violation. The circumstances under which this section applies are either:

(a) Where violation of the provision was required by a law of the federal government or by any rule, regulation, directive or order of any agency of the federal government, the violation of which is subject to penalty under an act of Congress or by any valid order of military authority.

(b) Where violation of the provision was required in order to comply with any regulation, directive, or order of the Governor promulgated under the California Emergency Services Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

40831.

In any civil action proof of speed in excess of any prima facie limit declared in Section 22352 at a particular time and place does not establish negligence as a matter of law but in all such actions it shall be necessary to establish as a fact that the operation of a vehicle at the excess speed constituted negligence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

40832.

No record of the suspension or revocation of the privilege to operate a motor vehicle by the department, nor any testimony of or concerning or produced at the hearing terminating in the suspension or revocation, shall be admissible as evidence in any court in any civil action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

40833.

Neither the report required by Sections 16000, 16001, 16002, or 16003, the action taken by the department pursuant to Chapter 1 of Division 7 (commencing at Section 16000), the findings, if any, of the department upon which action is based, nor the security filed as provided in that chapter shall be referred to in any way, or be any evidence of the negligence or due care of any party, at the trial of any action at law to recover damages.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

40834.

A judgment of conviction for any violation of this code or of any local ordinance relating to the operation of a motor vehicle or a finding reported under Section 1816 shall not be res judicata or constitute a collateral estoppel of any issue determined therein in any subsequent civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1530.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Evidence [40900. - 40903.]

40900.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a verification by telegraph, teletype, facsimile transmission, or any other electronic device, from the department, of ownership of a vehicle registered pursuant to this code, is admissible in evidence as proof of ownership of the vehicle in any proceeding involving a parking violation of this code, or any local parking ordinance adopted pursuant to this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 13, Sec. 65.   Effective February 13, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

40901.

(a) A court, pursuant to this section, may by rule provide for the trial of any alleged infraction involving a violation of this code or any local ordinance adopted pursuant to this code.

(b) The rules governing the trials may provide for testimony and other relevant evidence to be introduced in the form of a notice to appear issued pursuant to Section 40500 and, notwithstanding Division 10 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Evidence Code, a business record or receipt.

(c) Prior to the entry of a waiver of constitutional right pursuant to any rules adopted under this section, the court shall inform the defendant in writing of the nature of the proceedings and of his or her right to confront and cross-examine witnesses, to subpoena witnesses on his or her behalf, and to hire counsel at his or her own expense. The court shall ascertain that the defendant knowingly and voluntarily waives his or her right to be confronted by the witnesses against him or her, to subpoena witnesses in his or her behalf, and to hire counsel on his or her behalf before proceeding.

(d) In any jurisdiction with a non-English speaking population exceeding 5 percent of the total population of the jurisdiction in any one language, a written explanation of the procedures and rights under this section shall be available in that language.

(e) Except as set forth above, nothing contained herein shall be interpreted to permit the submission of evidence other than in accordance with the law, nor to prevent courts from adopting other rules to provide for trials in accordance with the law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 148.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

40902.

(a) (1) The court , pursuant to this section, shall, by rule, provide that the defendant may elect to have a trial by written declaration upon any alleged infraction, as charged by the citing officer, involving a violation of this code or any local ordinance adopted pursuant to this code, other than an infraction cited pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 23152) of Chapter 12 of Division 11.

(2) The Judicial Council may adopt rules and forms governing trials by declaration in accordance with this section. Any rule or form adopted by the Judicial Council pursuant to this paragraph shall supersede any local rule of a court adopted pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) If the defendant elects to have a trial by written declaration, the defendant shall, at the time of submitting that declaration, submit bail in the amount established in the uniform traffic penalty schedule pursuant to Section 40310. If the defendant is found not guilty or if the charges are otherwise dismissed, the amount of the bail shall be promptly refunded to the defendant.

(c) Notwithstanding Division 10 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Evidence Code, the rules governing trials by written declaration may provide for testimony and other relevant evidence to be introduced in the form of a notice to appear issued pursuant to Section 40500, a business record or receipt, a sworn declaration of the arresting officer, or a written statement or letter signed by the defendant.

(d) If the defendant is dissatisfied with a decision of the court in a proceeding pursuant to this section, the defendant shall be granted a trial de novo.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 265, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

40903.

(a) Any person who fails to appear as provided by law may be deemed to have elected to have a trial by written declaration upon any alleged infraction, as charged by the citing officer, involving a violation of this code or any local ordinance adopted pursuant to this code.

(b) Notwithstanding Division 10 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Evidence Code, testimony and other relevant evidence may be introduced in the form of a notice to appear issued pursuant to Section 40500, a notice of parking violation issued pursuant to Section 40202, a notice of delinquent parking violation issued pursuant to Section 40206, a business record or receipt, a sworn declaration of the arresting officer, or a written statement or letter signed by the defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 696, Sec. 95.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Presumptions [41100. - 41104.]

41100.

In any action involving the question of unlawful speed of a vehicle upon a highway which has been signposted with speed restriction signs of a type complying with the requirements of this code, it shall be presumed that existing facts authorize the erection of the signs and that the prima facie speed limit on the highway is the limit stated on the signs. This presumption may be rebutted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

41101.

(a) Whenever a traffic sign or traffic control device is placed in a position approximately conforming to the requirements of this code, it shall be presumed to have been placed by the official act or direction of lawful authority, unless the contrary is established by competent evidence.

(b) Any sign or traffic control device placed pursuant to this code and purporting to conform to the lawful requirements pertaining to it shall be presumed to comply with the requirements of this code unless the contrary is established by competent evidence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

41104.

In any case, involving an accident or otherwise, where any rear component of a train of vehicles fails to follow substantially in the path of the towing vehicle while moving upon a highway, the vehicle shall be presumed to have been operated in violation of Section 21711.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 44.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Defenses [41400. - 41403.]

41400.

Whenever any person is charged with a violation of this code, it is a sufficient defense to such charge if it appears that in a criminal prosecution in another state or by the Federal Government, founded upon the act or omission in respect to which he is on trial, he has been convicted or acquitted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

41401.

No person shall be prosecuted for a violation of any provision of this code if the violation was required by a law of the federal government, by any rule, regulation, directive or order of any agency of the federal government, the violation of which is subject to penalty under an act of Congress, or by any valid order of military authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 78.)
-------------------------------------------

41402.

No person shall be prosecuted for a violation of any provision of this code when violation of such provision is required in order to comply with any regulation, directive, or order of the Governor promulgated under the California Emergency Services Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

41403.

(a) In any proceedings to have a judgment of conviction of a violation of Section 14601, 14601.1, 14601.2, 23152, or 23153, or Section 23103 as specified in Section 23103.5, which was entered in a separate proceeding, declared invalid on constitutional grounds, the defendant shall state in writing and with specificity wherein the defendant was deprived of the defendant’s constitutional rights, which statement shall be filed with the clerk of the court and a copy served on the court that rendered that judgment and on the prosecuting attorney in the present proceedings at least five court days prior to the hearing thereon. 

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the court shall, prior to the trial of any pending criminal action against the defendant wherein the separate conviction is charged as such, hold a hearing, outside of the presence of the jury, in order to determine the constitutional validity of the charged separate conviction issue. At the hearing the procedure, the burden of proof, and the burden of producing evidence shall be as follows:

(1) The prosecution shall initially have the burden of producing evidence of the separate conviction sufficient to justify a finding that the defendant has suffered that separate conviction.

(2) After the production of evidence required by paragraph (1), the defendant then has the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant’s constitutional rights were infringed in the separate proceeding at issue. If the separate conviction sought to be invalidated is based upon a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, the defendant shall provide the court with evidence of the prior plea, including the court docket, written waivers of constitutional rights executed by the defendant, and transcripts of the relevant court proceedings at the time of the entry of the defendant’s plea. These records shall be provided to the defendant without cost to him or her, when the defendant is represented by the public defender or counsel appointed pursuant to Section 987.2 of the Penal Code.

(3) If the defendant bears this burden successfully, the prosecution shall have the right to produce evidence in rebuttal.

(4) The court shall make a finding on the basis of the evidence thus produced and shall strike from the accusatory pleading any separate conviction found to be constitutionally invalid.

(c) If the defendant fails to comply with the notice requirement of subdivision (a) or fails to produce the evidence required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the court shall hear the motion at the time of sentencing in lieu of continuing the trial, unless good cause is shown for failure to provide notice pursuant to subdivision (a) or produce the evidence required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), in which case the court shall grant a continuance of the trial for a reasonable period. The procedure, burden of proof, and burden of producing evidence as provided in subdivision (b) shall apply regardless of when the motion is heard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 83, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Nonprosecution of Violations [41500. - 41501.]

41500.

(a) A person shall not be subject to prosecution for a nonfelony offense arising out of the operation of a motor vehicle or violation of this code as a pedestrian that is pending against them at the time of their commitment to the custody of the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Division of Juvenile Justice in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or to a county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a driver’s license shall not be suspended or revoked, and the issuance or renewal of a license shall not be refused as a result of a pending nonfelony offense occurring
 prior to the time a person was committed to the custody of the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or a county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or as a result of a notice received by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of former Section 40509 when the offense that gave rise to the notice occurred prior to the time a person was committed to the custody of the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(c) The department shall remove from its records notice received by it pursuant to
 subdivision (a) of former
 Section 40509 upon receipt of satisfactory evidence that a person was committed to the custody of the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or a county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, after the offense that gave rise to the notice occurred.

(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a nonfelony offense if the department is required by this code to immediately revoke or suspend the privilege of a person to drive a motor vehicle upon receipt of a duly certified abstract of the record of a court showing that the person has been convicted of that nonfelony offense.

(e) The provisions of subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) do not apply to an offense committed by a person while that person is temporarily released from custody pursuant to law or while they are on parole or postrelease community supervision.

(f) The provisions of subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) do not apply if the pending offense is a violation of Section 23103, 23152, or 23153.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 25.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

41501.

(a) After a deposit of bail and bail forfeiture, a plea of guilty or no contest, or a conviction, the court may order a continuance of a proceeding against a person, who receives a notice to appear in court for a violation of a statute relating to the safe operation of a vehicle, in consideration for successful completion of a course of instruction at a licensed school for traffic violators and pursuant to Section 1803.5 or 42005, the court may order that the conviction be held confidential by the department in accordance with Section 1808.7. The court shall notify a person that only one conviction within 18 months will be held confidential.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a person who receives a notice to appear as
 to, or is otherwise charged with, a violation of an offense described in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 12810.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2011.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 599) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 311.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Arrest Quotas [41600. - 41603.]

41600.

For purposes of this chapter, “arrest quota” means any requirement regarding the number of arrests made, or the number of citations issued, by a peace officer, or parking enforcement employee, or the proportion of those arrests made and citations issued by a peace officer or parking enforcement employee, relative to the arrests made and citations issued by another peace officer or parking enforcement employee, or group of officers or employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

41601.

For purposes of this chapter, “citation” means a notice to appear, notice of violation, or notice of parking violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1111.)
-------------------------------------------

41601.5.

For purposes of this chapter, “agency” includes the Regents of the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 105, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

41602.

No state or local agency employing peace officers or parking enforcement employees engaged in the enforcement of this code or any local ordinance adopted pursuant to this code, may establish any policy requiring any peace officer or parking enforcement employees to meet an arrest quota.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 105, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

41603.

No state or local agency employing peace officers or parking enforcement employees engaged in the enforcement of this code shall use the number of arrests or citations issued by a peace officer or parking enforcement employees as the sole criterion for promotion, demotion, dismissal, or the earning of any benefit provided by the agency. Those arrests or citations, and their ultimate dispositions, may only be considered in evaluating the overall performance of a peace officer or parking enforcement employees. An evaluation may include, but shall not be limited to, criteria such as attendance, punctuality, work safety, complaints by
 civilians,
 commendations, demeanor, formal training, and professional judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 99, Sec. 7.   (AB 1953)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Consolidated Disposition [41610. - 41610.]

41610.

(a) Whenever a person who is in custody enters a guilty plea to an infraction or misdemeanor under this code and there is outstanding any warrant of arrest for a violation of this code or a local ordinance adopted pursuant to this code that is filed in any court within the same county, the defendant may elect to enter a guilty plea to any of these charged offenses of which the court has a record, except offenses specified in subdivision (b). The court shall sentence the defendant for each of the offenses for which a guilty plea has been entered pursuant to this section, and shall notify the appropriate court or department in each affected judicial district of the disposition. After receiving that notice of
 disposition, the court in which each complaint was filed shall prepare and transmit to the department any certification required by applicable provisions of former Section 40509 as if the court had heard the case.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not authorize entry of a guilty plea as specified in that subdivision to an offense for which a notice of parking violation has been issued, nor to any offense specified in Section 14601.2, 14601.3, 20002, 23103, 23104, 23105, 23152, or 23153, subdivision (a) of Section 14601, or subdivision (a) of Section 14601.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 26.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 18. PENALTIES AND DISPOSITION OF FEES, FINES, AND FORFEITURES [42000. - 42277.]



CHAPTER 1. Penalties [42000. - 42032.]



  ARTICLE 1. Public Offenses [42000. - 42010.]

42000.

Unless a different penalty is expressly provided by this code, every person convicted of a felony for a violation of any provision of this code shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 615.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

42000.1.

Notwithstanding Section 42001, every person convicted of an infraction for a violation described in subdivision (b) of Section 22348 shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 980, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

42000.5.

Every person convicted of an infraction for a violation of Section 22350, 22406, or 22407 while operating a bus, motor truck, or truck tractor having three or more axles, or any motor truck or truck tractor drawing any other vehicle, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for a first conviction, except that if the person has exceeded the specified speed limit by 10 miles per hour or more, the fine shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200) for a first conviction, and not exceeding three hundred dollars ($300) for a second or subsequent conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 980, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.

(a) Except as provided in this code, a person convicted of an infraction for a violation of this code or of a local ordinance adopted pursuant to this code shall be punished as follows:

(1) By a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) For a second infraction occurring within one year of a prior infraction that resulted in a conviction, a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200).

(3) For a third or subsequent infraction occurring within one year of two or more prior infractions that resulted in convictions, a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(b) A pedestrian convicted of an infraction for a violation of this code or any local ordinance adopted pursuant to this code shall be punished by a fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50).

(c) A person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 27150.3 shall be punished by a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), and a person convicted of a violation of subdivision (c) of Section 27150.3 shall be punished by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a local public entity that employs peace officers, as designated under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, the California State University, and the University of California may, by ordinance or resolution, establish a schedule of fines applicable to infractions committed by bicyclists within its jurisdiction. A fine, including all penalty assessments and court costs, established pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed the maximum fine, including penalty assessment and court costs, otherwise authorized by this code for that violation. If a bicycle fine schedule is adopted, it shall be used by the courts having jurisdiction over the area within which the ordinance or resolution is applicable instead of the fines, including penalty assessments and court costs, otherwise applicable under this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 900, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.1.

(a) Every person convicted of an infraction for a violation of Section 2815 or a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 22526 at an intersection posted pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 22526 shall be punished as follows:

(1) For a first conviction, a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) For a second conviction within a period of one year, a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200).

(3) For a third or any subsequent conviction within a period of two years, a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) In addition to the fine specified in subdivision (a), the court may order the department to suspend the driver’s license for up to 30 days of any person convicted of a third or any subsequent conviction of Section 2815 within a period of two years, and the department shall suspend the license for the period of time so ordered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 716, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.2.

(a) A person convicted of an infraction for a violation of Section 27153.5 with a motor vehicle having a manufacturer’s maximum gross vehicle weight rating of 6,001 or more pounds is punishable by a fine for the first offense of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), and for a second or subsequent offense within one year of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(b) A person convicted of an infraction for a second or subsequent violation of Section 27153, or a second or subsequent violation of 27153.5, with a motor vehicle having a manufacturer’s maximum gross vehicle weight rating of less than 6,001 pounds, is punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred thirty-five dollars ($135) nor more than two hundred eighty-five dollars ($285).

(c) Notwithstanding Section 40616, the penalties in subdivision (b) apply when a person is guilty of willfully violating a written promise to correct, or willfully failing to deliver proof of correction, as prescribed in Section 40616, when an offense described in subdivision (b) was the violation for which the notice to correct was issued and the person was previously convicted of the same offense, except that costs of repair shall be limited to those specified in Section 44017 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and subject to Section 1463.15 of the Penal Code, revenues collected from fines and forfeitures imposed under this section shall be allocated as follows: 15 percent to the county in which the prosecution is conducted, 10 percent to the prosecuting agency, 25 percent to the enforcement agency, except the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and 50 percent to the air quality management district or air pollution control district in which the infraction occurred, to be used for programs to regulate or control emissions from vehicular sources of air pollution. If the enforcement agency is the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the revenues shall be allocated 25 percent to the county in which the prosecution is conducted, 25 percent to the prosecuting agency, and 50 percent to the air quality management district or air pollution control district in which the infraction occurred. If no prosecuting agency is involved, the revenues that would otherwise be allocated to the prosecuting agency shall instead be allocated to the air quality management district or air pollution control district in which the infraction occurred.

(e) For the purposes of subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), a second or subsequent offense does not include an offense involving a different motor vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 482, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.3.

(a) Violations of Section 34506.3, with respect to any regulation adopted under Section 34501 relative to the maintenance of driving logs, shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) Violations of subdivision (a) of Section 34506, with respect to any regulation adopted under Section 34501 relative to drivers’ hours of service, shall be punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). In addition, the violations may be punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 631, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.4.

Every person convicted of an infraction for violation of Section 23117 shall be punished as follows:

(a) By a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) For a second infraction occurring within one year of a prior infraction which resulted in a conviction, a fine of not less than seventy-five dollars ($75) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200).

(c) For a third or any subsequent infraction occurring within one year of two or more prior infractions which resulted in convictions, a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 224, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.5.

(a) A person convicted of an infraction for a violation of subdivision (i) or (l) of Section 22500, or of Section 22522, shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(b) No part of any fine imposed under this section may be suspended, except the court may suspend that portion of the fine above one hundred dollars ($100).

(c) A fine imposed under this section may be paid in installments if the court determines that the defendant is unable to pay the entire amount in one payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 555, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.6.

Every person convicted of an infraction for a violation of Section 22511.1 is punishable by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100).

No part of any fine imposed shall be suspended, except the court may suspend that portion of the fine above twenty-five dollars ($25) for a violation of Section 22511.1 if the person convicted possessed at the time of the offense, but failed to display, a valid zero-emission vehicle decal identification issued pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5205.5. The fine may be paid in installments if the court determines that the defendant is unable to pay the entire amount in one payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 414, Sec. 4.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.7.

(a) Every person convicted of a violation of Section 23111 or 23112, or subdivision (a) of Section 23113, shall be punished by a mandatory fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) upon a first conviction, by a mandatory fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) upon a second conviction, and by a mandatory fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) upon a third or subsequent conviction.

In no case may the court order imprisonment in the county jail for a violation punishable under this subdivision, unless imprisonment is ordered pursuant to Section 166 of the Penal Code.

(b) The court shall, in addition to the fines imposed pursuant to subdivision (a), order the offender to pick up litter or clean up graffiti at a time and place within the jurisdiction of the court as follows:

(1) For a first conviction punished pursuant to subdivision (a), the court shall require the offender to pick up litter or clean up graffiti for not less than eight hours.

(2) For a second conviction punished pursuant to subdivision (a), the court shall require the offender to pick up litter or clean up graffiti for not less than 16 hours.

(3) For a third or subsequent conviction punished pursuant to subdivision (a), the court shall require the offender to pick up litter or clean up graffiti for not less than 24 hours.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that persons convicted of highway littering be required to bear the penalty for their actions. Therefore, the court may not suspend the mandatory fines required by subdivision (a) except in unusual cases where the interest of justice would best be served by suspension of the fine. If the court suspends imposition of any fine required by subdivision (a), it shall, as a condition of that suspension, require the offender to pick up litter or clean up graffiti at a time and place within the jurisdiction of the court for not less than eight hours for every one hundred dollars ($100) of fine suspended. The court may not suspend the order to pick up litter or clean up graffiti required by this subdivision or subdivision (b) except in unusual cases where the interest of justice would best be served by suspension of that order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 982, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.8.

Every person convicted of an infraction for a violation of Section 4000 shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) and not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1126, Sec. 8.   Effective September 28, 1985.   Operative April 1, 1986, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 1126.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.9.

Every person convicted of an infraction for a violation of Section 23135 shall be punished by a fine of fifty dollars ($50).

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 421.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.10.

Every person convicted for a violation of Section 38020 shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) for a first offense, and not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for every subsequent offense.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 42001.9 (as amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1027) by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 184.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.11.

Every person convicted of an infraction for a violation of Section 21655.5 or 21655.8 shall be punished as follows:

(a) For a first conviction, a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(b) For a second conviction within a period of one year, a fine of not less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150), nor more than two hundred dollars ($200). 

(c) For a third or any subsequent conviction within a period of two years, a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1054, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.12.

Every person convicted of an infraction for a violation of Section 21806 shall be punished as follows:

(a) For a first conviction, by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250). 

(b) For a second conviction within one year, by a fine of not less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500). 

(c) For a third or any subsequent conviction within three years, by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 13, Sec. 67.   Effective February 13, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.13.
